dicts/he_IL-ooe/he_IL.aff
FLAG num
SFX  10105 Y 1
SFX  10105 0 לם/64998 .
SFX  13310 Y 1
SFX  13310 ן נפו/64992 .
SFX  6781 Y 1
SFX  6781 0 דויותייך/64993 .
SFX  8326 Y 1
SFX  8326 0 אותה/64993 .
SFX  12317 Y 1
SFX  12317 0 יליך/64991 .
SFX  8701 Y 1
SFX  8701 0 יליך/64993 .
SFX  7283 Y 1
SFX  7283 0 שוהו/64992 .
SFX  11518 Y 1
SFX  11518 ך כת/64991 .
SFX  5638 Y 1
SFX  5638 0 יים/64991 .
SFX  13339 Y 1
SFX  13339 0 יים/64992 .
SFX  11084 Y 1
SFX  11084 ך כת/64993 .
SFX  9902 Y 1
SFX  9902 0 יים/64993 .
SFX  10625 Y 1
SFX  10625 0 נותם/64992 .
SFX  7185 Y 1
SFX  7185 0 נותם/64993 .
SFX  11598 Y 1
SFX  11598 ל נת/64991 .
SFX  6187 Y 1
SFX  6187 ל נת/64992 .
SFX  9391 Y 1
SFX  9391 ל נת/64993 .
SFX  6670 Y 1
SFX  6670 0 וחיהם/64993 .
SFX  10408 Y 1
SFX  10408 0 נותם/64998 .
SFX  12824 Y 1
SFX  12824 0 שב/64991 .
SFX  6752 Y 1
SFX  6752 0 שב/64992 .
SFX  10964 Y 1
SFX  10964 0 גום/64992 .
SFX  6373 Y 1
SFX  6373 ם מו/64992 .
SFX  12563 Y 1
SFX  12563 0 תר/64991 .
SFX  5360 Y 1
SFX  5360 ם מו/64993 .
SFX  5314 Y 1
SFX  5314 0 תר/64992 .
SFX  10435 Y 1
SFX  10435 ם מו/64995 .
SFX  5565 Y 1
SFX  5565 0 תר/64993 .
SFX  11075 Y 1
SFX  11075 0 בוה/64992 .
SFX  11745 Y 1
SFX  11745 ו ין/64991 .
SFX  10423 Y 1
SFX  10423 0 תר/64997 .
SFX  8571 Y 1
SFX  8571 ם מו/64999 .
SFX  11784 Y 1
SFX  11784 ו ין/64992 .
SFX  11210 Y 1
SFX  11210 ו ין/64993 .
SFX  8856 Y 1
SFX  8856 0 יון/64991 .
SFX  6599 Y 1
SFX  6599 0 ין/64991 .
SFX  11583 Y 1
SFX  11583 0 ביך/64991 .
SFX  5797 Y 1
SFX  5797 0 לים/64991 .
SFX  5926 Y 1
SFX  5926 0 ין/64992 .
SFX  6823 Y 1
SFX  6823 ו ין/64994 .
SFX  13597 Y 1
SFX  13597 0 לים/64992 .
SFX  8787 Y 1
SFX  8787 0 יון/64993 .
SFX  7536 Y 1
SFX  7536 0 וני/64991 .
SFX  6401 Y 1
SFX  6401 0 ין/64993 .
SFX  5290 Y 1
SFX  5290 0 ביך/64993 .
SFX  5389 Y 1
SFX  5389 0 וני/64992 .
SFX  5143 Y 1
SFX  5143 0 ניות/64991 .
SFX  5120 Y 1
SFX  5120 0 ין/64994 .
SFX  10771 Y 1
SFX  10771 0 ינוכם/64992 .
SFX  10290 Y 1
SFX  10290 0 לים/64994 .
SFX  5105 Y 1
SFX  5105 0 וני/64993 .
SFX  6710 Y 1
SFX  6710 0 וני/64994 .
SFX  7281 Y 1
SFX  7281 0 שום/64992 .
SFX  11201 Y 1
SFX  11201 ח ינום/64992 .
SFX  8885 Y 1
SFX  8885 ד יקנו/64993 .
SFX  6780 Y 1
SFX  6780 0 דויותיך/64993 .
SFX  12499 Y 1
SFX  12499 ס פל/64991 .
SFX  13306 Y 1
SFX  13306 ס פל/64992 .
SFX  11861 Y 1
SFX  11861 ח ידנה/64992 .
SFX  10513 Y 1
SFX  10513 ד יקנו/64998 .
SFX  8325 Y 1
SFX  8325 0 אותו/64993 .
SFX  11877 Y 1
SFX  11877 ח ילנה/64992 .
SFX  6668 Y 1
SFX  6668 0 וחיו/64993 .
SFX  7282 Y 1
SFX  7282 0 שוך/64992 .
SFX  10624 Y 1
SFX  10624 0 נותן/64992 .
SFX  7184 Y 1
SFX  7184 0 נותן/64993 .
SFX  6839 Y 1
SFX  6839 0 יבהו/64992 .
SFX  6669 Y 1
SFX  6669 0 וחיהן/64993 .
SFX  10407 Y 1
SFX  10407 0 נותן/64998 .
SFX  6897 Y 1
SFX  6897 0 ינהו/64992 .
SFX  5570 Y 1
SFX  5570 0 ונותן/64993 .
SFX  7035 Y 1
SFX  7035 ר שב/64992 .
SFX  6572 Y 1
SFX  6572 0 גנים/64991 .
SFX  13583 Y 1
SFX  13583 0 גנים/64992 .
SFX  6844 Y 1
SFX  6844 ה וד/64992 .
SFX  11074 Y 1
SFX  11074 0 בוהו/64992 .
SFX  13006 Y 1
SFX  13006 ט ין/64991 .
SFX  13902 Y 1
SFX  13902 ט ין/64992 .
SFX  13304 Y 1
SFX  13304 0 יוני/64991 .
SFX  11255 Y 1
SFX  11255 ט ין/64993 .
SFX  5636 Y 1
SFX  5636 0 יות/64991 .
SFX  12370 Y 1
SFX  12370 0 דותיה/64991 .
SFX  12344 Y 1
SFX  12344 ט ין/64994 .
SFX  8855 Y 1
SFX  8855 0 יוני/64993 .
SFX  5104 Y 1
SFX  5104 0 ון/64991 .
SFX  7603 Y 1
SFX  7603 0 דותיה/64993 .
SFX  5388 Y 1
SFX  5388 0 ון/64992 .
SFX  6321 Y 1
SFX  6321 ף פן/64991 .
SFX  10770 Y 1
SFX  10770 0 ינוכן/64992 .
SFX  6712 Y 1
SFX  6712 0 ון/64993 .
SFX  5019 Y 1
SFX  5019 ף פן/64992 .
SFX  6709 Y 1
SFX  6709 0 ון/64994 .
SFX  8061 Y 1
SFX  8061 ף פן/64993 .
SFX  12397 Y 1
SFX  12397 0 גיהם/64991 .
SFX  12273 Y 1
SFX  12273 0 ירני/64991 .
SFX  11200 Y 1
SFX  11200 ח ינון/64992 .
SFX  8035 Y 1
SFX  8035 0 גיהם/64993 .
SFX  12877 Y 1
SFX  12877 0 יקתני/64991 .
SFX  11766 Y 1
SFX  11766 0 ירני/64992 .
SFX  9807 Y 1
SFX  9807 0 יקתני/64992 .
SFX  9587 Y 1
SFX  9587 0 ירני/64993 .
SFX  7703 Y 1
SFX  7703 ף פן/64998 .
SFX  6779 Y 1
SFX  6779 0 דויותיכם/64993 .
SFX  13968 Y 1
SFX  13968 ן סני/64992 .
SFX  8623 Y 1
SFX  8623 0 אותי/64991 .
SFX  13987 Y 1
SFX  13987 ן ננה/64992 .
SFX  8324 Y 1
SFX  8324 0 אותי/64993 .
SFX  6667 Y 1
SFX  6667 0 וחיי/64993 .
SFX  12858 Y 1
SFX  12858 0 יקנו/64991 .
SFX  6929 Y 1
SFX  6929 ד ונן/64993 .
SFX  5678 Y 1
SFX  5678 0 יקנו/64992 .
SFX  9755 Y 1
SFX  9755 0 יקנו/64993 .
SFX  6501 Y 1
SFX  6501 0 חת/64991 .
SFX  9328 Y 1
SFX  9328 0 יקנו/64998 .
SFX  6190 Y 1
SFX  6190 0 חת/64992 .
SFX  8001 Y 1
SFX  8001 0 חת/64993 .
SFX  12805 Y 1
SFX  12805 0 יג/64991 .
SFX  13005 Y 1
SFX  13005 ט ינה/64991 .
SFX  5623 Y 1
SFX  5623 0 יג/64992 .
SFX  13760 Y 1
SFX  13760 ט ינה/64992 .
SFX  9460 Y 1
SFX  9460 0 יג/64993 .
SFX  13500 Y 1
SFX  13500 ט ינה/64993 .
SFX  5569 Y 1
SFX  5569 0 ונותנו/64993 .
SFX  12161 Y 1
SFX  12161 ר שני/64991 .
SFX  10370 Y 1
SFX  10370 ט ינה/64994 .
SFX  8471 Y 1
SFX  8471 ר שני/64992 .
SFX  12673 Y 1
SFX  12673 0 גש/64991 .
SFX  9753 Y 1
SFX  9753 ר שני/64993 .
SFX  6154 Y 1
SFX  6154 0 גש/64992 .
SFX  11481 Y 1
SFX  11481 0 גש/64993 .
SFX  11254 Y 1
SFX  11254 ט ינה/64999 .
SFX  6918 Y 1
SFX  6918 ד ודיה/64993 .
SFX  11073 Y 1
SFX  11073 0 בוך/64992 .
SFX  11937 Y 1
SFX  11937 ח יסו/64992 .
SFX  12231 Y 1
SFX  12231 0 יחות/64991 .
SFX  12369 Y 1
SFX  12369 0 דותיהם/64991 .
SFX  6265 Y 1
SFX  6265 0 תיו/64991 .
SFX  12461 Y 1
SFX  12461 0 יעתם/64991 .
SFX  9149 Y 1
SFX  9149 0 רכם/64991 .
SFX  5387 Y 1
SFX  5387 0 תיו/64992 .
SFX  7602 Y 1
SFX  7602 0 דותיהם/64993 .
SFX  9473 Y 1
SFX  9473 0 יעתם/64992 .
SFX  5220 Y 1
SFX  5220 0 תיו/64993 .
SFX  5063 Y 1
SFX  5063 0 רכם/64992 .
SFX  11445 Y 1
SFX  11445 ח יסו/64999 .
SFX  8700 Y 1
SFX  8700 0 יעתם/64993 .
SFX  5462 Y 1
SFX  5462 0 רכם/64993 .
SFX  12396 Y 1
SFX  12396 0 גיהן/64991 .
SFX  8034 Y 1
SFX  8034 0 גיהן/64993 .
SFX  9272 Y 1
SFX  9272 0 מוה/64992 .
SFX  7534 Y 1
SFX  7534 0 יסטיי/64993 .
SFX  6765 Y 1
SFX  6765 0 רכם/64998 .
SFX  10594 Y 1
SFX  10594 ג יר/64993 .
SFX  6778 Y 1
SFX  6778 0 דויותיכן/64993 .
SFX  8921 Y 1
SFX  8921 0 דתים/64992 .
SFX  12071 Y 1
SFX  12071 ץ צת/64991 .
SFX  12015 Y 1
SFX  12015 ץ צת/64993 .
SFX  8323 Y 1
SFX  8323 0 אותך/64993 .
SFX  7405 Y 1
SFX  7405 0 וסים/64991 .
SFX  13003 Y 1
SFX  13003 ן ען/64991 .
SFX  11756 Y 1
SFX  11756 ן ען/64992 .
SFX  11629 Y 1
SFX  11629 0 ובי/64991 .
SFX  13318 Y 1
SFX  13318 0 ובי/64993 .
SFX  13272 Y 1
SFX  13272 ו חם/64991 .
SFX  6916 Y 1
SFX  6916 ד ודייך/64993 .
SFX  8103 Y 1
SFX  8103 ו חם/64992 .
SFX  11420 Y 1
SFX  11420 ו חם/64993 .
SFX  13017 Y 1
SFX  13017 ט ינו/64991 .
SFX  5437 Y 1
SFX  5437 ח יחהו/64992 .
SFX  9980 Y 1
SFX  9980 ט ינו/64992 .
SFX  7540 Y 1
SFX  7540 ט ינו/64993 .
SFX  13187 Y 1
SFX  13187 ט ינו/64994 .
SFX  12367 Y 1
SFX  12367 0 דותיו/64991 .
SFX  10596 Y 1
SFX  10596 ו חם/64998 .
SFX  12378 Y 1
SFX  12378 0 דרת/64991 .
SFX  8659 Y 1
SFX  8659 ם מות/64991 .
SFX  7600 Y 1
SFX  7600 0 דותיו/64993 .
SFX  9218 Y 1
SFX  9218 0 דרת/64992 .
SFX  11253 Y 1
SFX  11253 ט ינו/64999 .
SFX  6917 Y 1
SFX  6917 ד ודיו/64993 .
SFX  11072 Y 1
SFX  11072 0 בום/64992 .
SFX  8941 Y 1
SFX  8941 0 דנוה/64992 .
SFX  13245 Y 1
SFX  13245 ט יע/64991 .
SFX  7877 Y 1
SFX  7877 ט יע/64992 .
SFX  10059 Y 1
SFX  10059 ט יע/64993 .
SFX  5440 Y 1
SFX  5440 ח יחים/64991 .
SFX  13610 Y 1
SFX  13610 ח יחים/64992 .
SFX  12368 Y 1
SFX  12368 0 דותיהן/64991 .
SFX  6264 Y 1
SFX  6264 0 תיך/64991 .
SFX  12460 Y 1
SFX  12460 0 יעתן/64991 .
SFX  9413 Y 1
SFX  9413 ח יחים/64994 .
SFX  9148 Y 1
SFX  9148 0 רכן/64991 .
SFX  7601 Y 1
SFX  7601 0 דותיהן/64993 .
SFX  5386 Y 1
SFX  5386 0 תיך/64992 .
SFX  9472 Y 1
SFX  9472 0 יעתן/64992 .
SFX  5062 Y 1
SFX  5062 0 רכן/64992 .
SFX  5219 Y 1
SFX  5219 0 תיך/64993 .
SFX  8699 Y 1
SFX  8699 0 יעתן/64993 .
SFX  5461 Y 1
SFX  5461 0 רכן/64993 .
SFX  13314 Y 1
SFX  13314 ם מע/64992 .
SFX  9271 Y 1
SFX  9271 0 מוהו/64992 .
SFX  6764 Y 1
SFX  6764 0 רכן/64998 .
SFX  7424 Y 1
SFX  7424 ב ירהו/64992 .
SFX  6777 Y 1
SFX  6777 0 דויותינו/64993 .
