dicts/he_IL-ooe/he_IL.dic
אתיי/5306,5309,5315,5704,5705,5767,5790,5838,6101,6241,6564,6577,6614,6752,7012,7013,7014,64993
היה/5599,5633,5634,9701,9702,10350,10406,10407,10408,10409,10410,10411,10412,10413,10414,10415,10416,10417,10418,10419,10420,10421,64992
היוו/6095,6096,6097,10338,10349,10422,10423,10424,10425,10426,10427,64992
היסכם/8434,8435,8572,8573,9284,9285,9286,9288,10428,10435,64997
הרצו/5193,5206,5207,5208,5209,5210,5211,5212,5213,5214,5215,5216,5217,5218,5219,5220,5221,5222,5223,5224,6114,7025,7027,7028,7029,8793,10913,11209,11210,64992
התפזם/8434,8435,8571,8572,8573,9283,9285,9286,9288,11437,64993
יורי/5075,5124,5247,5322,5323,5324,5325,5326,5327,5328,5329,5330,5365,5635,5646,5647,5648,5649,5650,5651,5652,5653,5847,6088,6201,6278,6318,7272,7278,7279,7280,7281,7282,7283,7284,7314,7315,7721,7723,7725,7912,8903,8907,8909,8910,8911,8912,8913,8914,8916,8917,64993
מיליטריסט/5194,5204,5339,5636,5637,5638,64991
מסוכסך/11085,11518,64991
מצפו/5080,5084,5089,5094,5126,5127,5128,5129,5130,5131,5132,5143,5144,5145,5193,5444,5446,5447,5454,5456,5458,5459,5460,5461,5462,5465,5467,5468,5469,5471,5473,5474,5475,5476,5477,5736,5829,6260,6261,6262,6263,6264,6265,6266,6267,6268,6269,6270,6271,11745,64993
מקסם/5360,5361,5362,5363,5364,64991
מראי/5082,5093,5095,5096,5097,5098,5099,5100,5101,5102,5103,5110,5111,5112,5113,5114,5115,5116,5117,5118,5119,5193,5204,5365,5655,6155,6156,6157,6158,6159,6272,6273,6274,6275,6276,6582,6599,8212,8213,9880,12087,64993
מתיי/8598,10456,10992,10993,12438,12449,12455,12456,12468,12474,12475,12482,12523,12677,12739,12804,12821,12822,12824,12827,12959,12960,12961,64993
נבול/5082,5087,5093,5192,5194,5331,5332,5599,7108,7110,8215,9391,64991
נוו/5082,5084,5192,5314,5343,5344,5345,5347,5348,5443,6091,6095,6096,6097,6308,6309,6310,7036,7037,7039,7041,7042,7043,7044,8670,10297,10298,10299,10300,10301,64993
נופן/13309,13310,13311,64993
נושל/5001,5004,5005,5016,5093,5193,5194,5373,5374,5375,5455,6490,7108,7110,8667,9390,11598,64991
נפול/5025,5767,5945,6611,8787,12700,64991
ערוך/11084,11085,64991
פלס/5079,5084,5192,5194,5333,5334,5335,5336,5337,5338,5339,5340,5341,5342,5343,5344,5345,5346,5347,5348,5599,8332,8333,8336,11562,12563,64991
פרז/5083,5093,5226,5599,5841,5842,5844,5845,5866,5877,5882,6072,6197,6202,6203,6205,6790,6791,7858,8017,8329,8474,8475,8476,8477,8478,8479,8480,8481,8482,8483,8484,8485,8486,8487,8488,8489,8490,8521,10101,10102,10103,10105,10106,10107,10108,10109,11436,12276,13366,13367,64997
צרח/5080,5082,5083,5087,5089,5093,5095,5096,5097,5098,5099,5100,5101,5102,5103,5110,5111,5112,5113,5114,5115,5116,5117,5118,5119,5125,5126,5143,5144,5145,5599,5840,5842,5843,5844,5845,6072,7112,7184,7185,7186,7187,7188,7189,7190,7191,7192,64992
שיג/5026,5057,5058,6195,6198,6199,6200,6466,6467,6468,6469,6470,6471,6472,6473,6474,6475,6476,6477,6478,6479,6480,6481,6482,6483,6484,6485,6486,7550,7551,8856,8859,8860,8861,8862,8863,8864,8865,8866,11599,13304,13305,64991
תבנאם/6373,13543,13560,64992
תוכל/5001,5009,5033,5202,5710,5718,6183,6184,6185,6186,6187,6196,6277,6637,6815,6819,6820,7108,7744,8661,9872,13524,13546,13577,64992
תמה/5026,5064,5082,5087,5089,5093,5123,5192,5194,5202,5373,5374,5375,5599,5840,5841,5842,5843,5844,5845,6072,6177,6194,6196,7584,8683,8684,8685,8686,8687,8688,8689,8690,8691,8693,8694,8695,8696,8697,8698,8701,8702,8703,8704,8705,13524,13561,64991
תעז/5009,5016,5711,5712,5713,5714,5715,5716,5717,5718,5721,5862,5878,6107,6194,6717,8661,10933,11070,11071,11072,11073,11074,11075,11470,11773,11887,13561,13577,13707,13786,13809,13810,13811,13812,13814,13815,13816,64992
תרמיל/5349,5351,5353,5354,5357,6935,8318,8319,8320,8321,8322,8323,8324,8325,8326,64991
תרמן/13968,64999
תרצו/5001,5002,5003,5004,5005,5008,5419,5735,6795,6822,7026,7248,7860,8105,11784,64999
תשדר/5001,5002,5003,5004,5005,5006,5007,5008,5009,5016,5028,5205,5331,5388,5389,5390,5391,5392,5393,5704,5705,5707,5922,5923,5924,5926,5927,5928,5945,6042,6043,6044,6045,6046,6047,6107,6822,9012,10954,10960,10963,10964,10965,10966,10967,11879,13579,13727,13728,13729,13730,13731,64992
